Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Small Claims

24A.200.
Purpose.

The purpose of KRS

24A.200

to

24A.360

is to improve the administration of justice in small noncriminal cases, and make the judicial system more available and comprehensible to the public; to simplify practice and procedure in the commencement, handling, and trial of such cases in order that plaintiffs may bring actions in their own behalf, and defendants may participate actively in the proceedings rather than default; to provide an efficient and inexpensive forum with the objective of dispensing justice in a speedy manner; and generally to promote the confidence of the public in the overall judicial system by providing a forum for small claims.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 2.

24A.210.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

24A.200

to

24A.360

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Division” means the small claims division of District Court;

“Party” means any person, natural or otherwise, who has been a party to the transaction in dispute;

“Clerk” means the clerk of the Circuit Court;

“Judge” means the judge or trial commissioner of District Court;

“Where the defendant resides” means the county wherein the defendant has his principal place of residence or, in the case of a corporate defendant, the county of the corporation headquarters;

“Where the defendant is doing business” includes counties where the defendant operates a place of business or dispatches sales representatives for the purpose of selling a product or service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 3.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An attorney-at-law may but is not required to appear in Small Claims Court on behalf of a corporation; however, any person appearing for a corporation in the small claims division of the District Court who is not an attorney must be an officer of, or regularly employed in a managerial capacity by, the corporation which is a party to the litigation.

OAG 80-572

.

24A.220.
Establishment of small claims division.

A small claims division of each District Court shall be established by the first Monday of January, 1978.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 4.

24A.230.
Jurisdiction — Authority.

The small claims division shall have jurisdiction, concurrent with that of the District Court, in all civil actions, other than libel, slander, alienation of affections, malicious prosecution and abuse of process actions, when the amount of money or damages or the value of the personal property claimed does not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) exclusive of interest and costs.

The division may also be used in civil matters when the plaintiff seeks to disaffirm, avoid, or rescind a contract or agreement for the purchase of goods or services not in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) exclusive of interest and costs.

The division shall have authority to grant appropriate relief, except no prejudgment actions for attachment, garnishment, replevin or other provisional remedy may be filed in the division.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 5; 1980, ch. 36, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 137, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2011, ch. 91, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011).
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 91, sec. 4, provides that “any case which has been filed in a Circuit Court or District Court prior to the effective date of this Act (June 8, 2011) and the change in jurisdictional amounts (made by
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 91) shall remain in the court in which the case was originally filed, until the disposition of the case.”

24A.240.
Appearance of attorneys — Actions prohibited — Personal representatives as parties.

The appearance of an attorney-at-law on behalf of any party is permitted but not required.

No party may file an assigned claim or a class action in the division.

No person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation engaged, either primarily or secondarily, in the business of lending money at interest, nor any collection agency or collection agent, may bring an action in the division in furtherance of their business.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an executor or administrator of a decedent’s estate, a guardian, a trustee or a conservator may be a party in the division.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 6.

Opinions of Attorney General.

As a bank must, clearly, be engaged in the business of lending money at interest, it is precluded from having an action brought in its name to collect on delinquent accounts, such action being in the furtherance of that business.

OAG 79-94

.

An attorney at law may but is not required to appear in Small Claims Court on behalf of a corporation; however, any person appearing for a corporation in the small claims division of the District Court who is not an attorney must be an officer of, or regularly employed in a managerial capacity by, the corporation which is a party to the litigation.

OAG 80-572

.

A city may bring a personal action against a taxpayer in the small claims division of district court to enforce the collection of delinquent municipal property taxes so long as the amount sought does not exceed $1,000; the limitation on the number of actions that may be brought by one party per year (25) would also apply to cities.

OAG 83-413

.

A collection agency can advance the small claims court costs for filing fees, along with the proper papers, to its clients without violating the law, so long as the action was not filed in the collection agency’s name and so long as the collection agency did not make any court appearance for its client.

OAG 83-420

.

24A.250.
Limitation on number of claims filed by party during calendar year — Exception.

No party shall file more than twenty-five (25) claims in any one (1) calendar year in the small claims division of any District Court in the Commonwealth. Any business engaged in trade or commerce shall be entitled to the maximum number of claims allowed under this section for each established location in the district that has been engaged in trade or commerce for at least six (6) months.

Any party who files a claim in the division shall sign an affidavit with the clerk at the time of filing the claim stating that he has not brought more than the maximum number of claims allowed under subsection (1) of this section.

If any party files a claim in excess of the maximum number of claims allowed, that claim shall be dismissed without prejudice at the cost of the plaintiff.

The limitation on the number of claims and the other requirements of this section shall not apply to claims brought by city, county, or urban-county governments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 7; 1990, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Greene, An Old Challenge in a New Dress, Vol. 42, No. 3, July 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 16.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Small Claims Court, § 2.00.

24A.260.
Commencement of action.

The plaintiff shall commence an action in the small claims division by filing a claim on a form provided by the clerk.

The plaintiff may bring an action in the small claims division in the judicial district where the party defendant or his agent resides or is doing business.

Nothing in this section shall limit the exercise of jurisdiction on any other basis authorized in the Kentucky Revised Statutes or in the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 8; 1982, ch. 124, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Notice of Transfer of Action (AOC 122), Form 2.07.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Venue and Change of Venue, § 38.00.

24A.270.
Filing fee.

The filing fee in the small claims division of the District Court shall be the same as the filing fee for claims of five hundred dollars ($500) or less filed in the District Court, except where personal service is not required pursuant to KRS 24A.280(2), the sheriff’s fee and mileage cost shall not be charged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 9; 1980, ch. 36, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Although KRS

24A.270

is included in Acts 1980, ch. 36, § 2, the proposed change was deleted by committee amendment.

24A.280.
Time for hearing — Service of notice on defendant — Continuances.

The court shall set a time for hearing. The hearing time set shall be not less than twenty (20) days nor more than forty (40) days after service of process.

The clerk shall notify the defendant of the claim and his right to appear by sending the defendant a copy of the claim and a summons directing the defendant to appear at the time set for hearing and informing the defendant that if he fails to appear, judgment may be entered against him. The mode of service shall be as authorized in the Kentucky Revised Statutes or in the Rules of Civil Procedure.

To promote quick settlement of small claims, the division shall grant continuances only where reasons of fairness and justice so require.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 10; 1980, ch. 114, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 124, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Greene, An Old Challenge in a New Dress, Vol. 42, No. 3, July 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 16.

Wiederstein, Firm Hearing and Trial Dates: A Partial Answer to Reducing Delay in the Courts, Vol. 70, No. 3, May 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 18.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Notice of Transfer of Action (AOC 122), Form 2.07.

24A.290.
Counterclaim — Notice.

The defendant may file with the clerk a counterclaim against the plaintiff in an amount not in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) exclusive of interest and costs, if the counterclaim arose out of the same transaction or occurrence that is the subject matter of the plaintiff’s claim, and if the counterclaim does not require for its adjudication the presence of third parties over whom the division cannot acquire jurisdiction. Any counterclaim shall be filed with the clerk, and a copy delivered to the plaintiff at least five (5) days prior to the time of the hearing. If the defendant’s counterclaim is in excess of the jurisdictional limits of the division, then the provisions of KRS 24A.310(1) shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 11; 1980, ch. 36, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 463, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2011, ch. 91, § 3, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011).
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 91, sec. 4, provides that “any case which has been filed in a Circuit Court or District Court prior to the effective date of this Act (June 8, 2011) and the change in jurisdictional amounts (made by
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 91) shall remain in the court in which the case was originally filed, until the disposition of the case.”

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Greene, An Old Challenge in a New Dress, Vol. 42, No. 3, July 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 16.

24A.300.
Pleadings — Forms — Pretrial discovery not permitted.

No formal pleadings other than the claim and notice, and the counterclaim and notice, if appropriate, shall be required in the division.

All forms provided in KRS

24A.200

to

24A.360

shall be of a simplified, nontechnical form.

There shall be no pretrial discovery in the small claims division of the District Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 12.

24A.310.
Removal of action to District or Circuit Court — Transfer of action to small claims division.

An action shall be removed from the small claims division to the regular docket of District or Circuit Court as appropriate whenever the defendant’s counterclaim exceeds the jurisdictional limit of the division or the District Court.

An action shall be removed from the division to the District Court if a party defendant would otherwise have a right to a jury trial and gives notice to the division requesting a jury trial as provided in KRS 24A.320(2).

An action may be removed from the division to the District Court if the judge, in his discretion, deems the action too complex for the simplified procedure of the division.

An action originally filed in the District or Circuit Courts may be transferred to the small claims division on motion of the defendant if the claim is within the jurisdictional limit of, and otherwise could have been brought originally in, the division, unless the plaintiff demands a jury trial. No action transferred to the division shall be counted in the maximum number of claims that the plaintiff may bring under KRS 24A.250(1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 13.

24A.320.
Waiver of jury trial — Removal to regular docket when jury trial requested.

All claims in the small claims division shall be tried without a jury. Upon filing a claim, the plaintiff shall be deemed to have waived his right to a jury trial in the division. This waiver shall be explained on the claim form provided by the clerk.

If the defendant in any action desires a jury trial, he shall give written notice to the division at least seven (7) days prior to the time set for the hearing, and the case shall be removed to the regular docket of the District Court, and shall thereafter be subject to all the provisions of law and rules of court applicable to proceedings in the District Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 14; 1990, ch. 463, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

24A.330.
Informal hearings.

The hearing and disposition of all matters in the small claims division shall be informal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 15.

24A.340.
Appeal.

Any party aggrieved by the judgment of the small claims division may appeal within ten (10) days of the judgment to the Circuit Court in the judicial circuit where such division is located.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 16.

24A.350.
Informational pamphlet — Preparation and distribution.

The Attorney General shall prepare an informational pamphlet or suitable material in layman’s language explaining the jurisdiction of the small claims division, procedures followed by the division, rights and responsibilities of parties to proceedings in the division, and other similar matters of importance.

The informational pamphlet shall be made available to all clerks. A copy of the pamphlet shall be given to the plaintiff upon filing the claim and mailed or delivered to the defendant along with service of process.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 17.

24A.360.
Short title.

KRS

24A.200

to

24A.360

shall be known and may be cited as the “Small Claims Act”.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Small Claims Court, § 2.00.